Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 192.49, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Officers. Every commissioned officer of the military forces shall receive from the state, while engaged in deleted text begin anydeleted text end new text begin state activenew text end service deleted text begin ordered by the governordeleted text end new text begin as defined in section 190.05, subdivision 5anew text end , pay and allowances at the rate now or hereafter paid or allowed by law to officers of the same grade and length of service in the armed forces of the United States, but not less than $130 a day. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 192.49, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Enlisted persons. When called into new text begin state new text end active service by the governor, other than for encampment or maneuvers, including the time necessarily consumed in travel, each enlisted person of the military forces shall be paid by the state the pay and the allowances, when not furnished in kind, provided by law for enlisted persons of similar grade, rating, and length of service in the armed forces of the United States, or $130 a day, whichever is more. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 192.49, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Pension offset stipend. new text end new text begin The adjutant general is authorized to pay service members ordered into state active service a stipend equivalent to five percent of basic pay for the period of duty to compensate the service member for pension inequity compared to similar federal service. new text end